Illinois, session 104th, SB1339.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Parks Designation Act is amended by 5adding Section 3.8 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 840/3.8 new)7    Sec. 3.8. Visitor Center and Arena at Giant City State 8Park. 9    (a) The visitor center located in Giant City State Park 10shall be known as the Bob Kristoff Visitor Center.11    (b) The arena located at Giant City Stables in Giant City 12State Park shall be known as the Richard A. Kelley  Arena. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.